New York, session 2025-2026, A10524.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2331 of the insurance law is REPEALED and a new 2 section 2331 is added to read as follows: 3 § 2331. Motor vehicle insurance fairness. (a) Definition. For purposes 4 of this section, the term "proceeding" shall mean the filing of any 5 rate, rating plan, rating rule or rating manual and any rulemaking 6 conducted pursuant to this section. 7 (b) Prohibitions; refusal to insure. (1) No insurer shall refuse to 8 issue or renew a policy or contract of motor vehicle insurance based in 9 whole or in part on any of the prohibited underwriting and rating 10 factors set forth in subsection (c) of this section, or use such factors 11 to determine the terms of coverage or placement in a particular affil- 12 iate within an insurance company group. 13 (2) Any schedule of rates, rating plan, rating rule, rating manual or 14 any other method of establishing the premium to be paid by a motor vehi- 15 cle insurance policyholder or covered driver, and the modification ther- 16 eof, based in whole or in part on any of the prohibited underwriting and 17 rating factors set forth in subsection (c) of this section shall be 18 deemed unfairly discriminatory. 19 (c) Prohibited factors. No filing of a rate, rating plan, rating rule 20 or rate manual applicable to motor vehicle insurance shall be approved 21 by the superintendent if the filing is based, in whole or in part, on 22 the following factors: 23 (1) any criteria protected under section two hundred ninety-six of the 24 executive law; 25 (2) age, except as provided for under subsection (d) of this section; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14984-03-6 A. 10524--A 2 1 (3) employment or occupation, except as it pertains to whether a vehi- 2 cle is being used for a business purpose and the nature of such use; 3 (4) education level attained; 4 (5) home ownership or property value; 5 (6) consumer credit information or any other credit-based score; 6 (7) the absence of prior insurance; 7 (8) the amount or provider of prior insurance coverage; 8 (9) any measure of a consumer's price elasticity of demand; 9 (10) the zip code, or any territorial designation geographically smal- 10 ler than a zip code, in which the policyholder resides, except as it 11 pertains to the rate of auto-related crimes, such as theft and vandal- 12 ism, or accident rates in such zip code or territorial designation; 13 (11) any data related to a consumer used to justify a rate increase 14 where such data is more than two years old; or 15 (12) the level of income or wealth. 16 (d) Years of driving experience. Notwithstanding paragraph two of 17 subsection (c) of this section, an insurer may consider the number of 18 years of driving experience of an applicant for the purposes of under- 19 writing and rating. 20 (e) Territory or any other geographical characteristic. Territory or 21 any other geographical characteristic shall not be considered for the 22 purposes of underwriting a policy or contract of motor vehicle insur- 23 ance, including, but not limited to, any decision to sell, refuse to 24 sell, cancel, or non-renew. Notwithstanding paragraph ten of subsection 25 (c) of this section, an insurer may, for rating purposes, use a territo- 26 rial factor that is not otherwise prohibited under this section if the 27 territorial factor does not have more than a ten percent impact on the 28 premium that would otherwise be charged. 29 (f) Prohibited business practices. Every insurer issuing or delivering 30 a policy or contract of motor vehicle insurance in the state of New York 31 shall demonstrate that its marketing, underwriting, rating, claims 32 handling, fraud investigations, and any algorithm or model used for 33 those such business practices do not disparately impact any group of 34 customers based on race, color, national or ethnic origin, religion, 35 sex, sexual orientation, disability, gender identity, or gender 36 expression. 37 (g) Prior approval of rates. (1) No rate shall be approved by the 38 superintendent or remain in effect that is excessive, inadequate, 39 unfairly discriminatory, or otherwise in violation of this section. In 40 considering whether a rate is excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discri- 41 minatory, no consideration shall be given to the degree of competition, 42 and the superintendent shall consider whether such rate mathematically 43 reflects the insurance company's investment income. 44 (2) Every insurer issuing or delivering a policy or contract of motor 45 vehicle insurance that desires to change any rate shall file a complete 46 rate application with the superintendent. A complete rate application 47 shall include all data necessary to justify the proposed rate and such 48 other information as the superintendent may require. The applicant shall 49 have the burden of proving that the requested rate change is justified 50 and meets the requirements of this section. 51 (3) The superintendent shall notify the public of any application by 52 an insurer for a rate change. The application shall be deemed approved 53 sixty days after such public notice unless: 54 (i) the superintendent disapproves of the application; 55 (ii) a consumer or such consumer's representative requests a hearing 56 within forty-five days after such public notice and the superintendent A. 10524--A 3 1 grants the hearing, or the superintendent determines not to grant the 2 hearing and issues written findings in support of such decision; or 3 (iii) the superintendent, on the superintendent's own motion, deter- 4 mines to hold a hearing. If the proposed rate adjustment exceeds five 5 percent of the then-applicable rate for personal motor vehicle insurance 6 or ten percent for commercial motor vehicle insurance, then the super- 7 intendent shall hold a hearing upon a timely request. If the application 8 is incomplete or otherwise subject to disapproval, then the superinten- 9 dent may extend the application review process by up to sixty days with 10 the agreement of the applicant. 11 (h) Right of the public to inspect rates. All information provided to 12 the superintendent pursuant to this section shall be available for 13 public inspection on the department's website, without the need to pay 14 for access or login credentials. The department shall establish on 15 their website a centralized online database to allow members of the 16 public to access and view any rate increase applications submitted by 17 insurers. Such database shall include, but not be limited to, the abili- 18 ty to search for specific insurance company rate applications, the abil- 19 ity to view public comments, and an option for individuals to submit 20 their own feedback. 21 (i) Right of the public to request permission to intervene. Any 22 person may request permission from the superintendent to intervene in 23 any proceeding permitted or established pursuant to this section. The 24 superintendent shall grant such permission if such intervention is like- 25 ly to contribute to the development of a complete record or is otherwise 26 fair and in the public interest. 27 (j) Rules. (1) The department shall, no later than ninety days from 28 the date this section takes effect, adopt rules and regulations that 29 guide the filing and approval of rates, rules, and forms pursuant to 30 this section. The superintendent shall develop formulas for evaluating 31 rates and any rules or forms that impact rates that will be used to 32 determine whether to approve or disapprove any filing. 33 (2) Until the rules and regulations described in paragraph one of this 34 subsection are implemented, no insurer may file for a change in any 35 rate, rule, or form that would result in a rate increase. If, before the 36 adoption of the rules and regulations described in paragraph one of this 37 subsection, an insurer asserts that it would not be able to earn a 38 reasonable rate of return without an increase, then such insurer may 39 request a hearing. If it is determined after a hearing that a rate 40 increase is needed to earn a reasonable rate of return, then the insurer 41 shall be allowed to make a change that affords it the minimum increase 42 required to earn a reasonable rate of return. 43 (3) The department shall, no later than one hundred eighty days from 44 the effective date of this section, adopt rules and regulations that 45 implement the testing of insurer business practices for compliance with 46 this section. 47 (k) Fees. All insurers of motor vehicle insurance subject to the 48 provisions of this section shall be assessed a fee of five hundredths of 49 one percent of their total earned premiums from the prior calendar year. 50 Such fee shall be payable to the department no later than July first of 51 each calendar year and shall be used by the department to implement the 52 provisions of this section. 53 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 54 have become a law.